Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-611
Separate offense, defined.

(1) Each individual animal of any species of wildlife taken in violation of the Game Law, (2) each individual animal of any species of wildlife shipped, offered or received for shipment, transported, bought, sold, bartered, or had in possession contrary to the Game Law, and (3) each seine, net, or other device, including ferrets, used or attempted to be used in violation of the Game Law, shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 11, p. 436;

C.S.1929, § 37-611;

R.S.1943, § 37-611;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 40;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-611;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 301.